Missouri, session 2026, HB1712.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 575.205, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 575.205, to read as follows:
575.205. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering with electronic monitoring
equipment if he or she intentionally removes, alters, tampers with, damages, [or] destroys,
fails to charge, or otherwise disables electronic monitoring equipment which a court, the
division of probation and parole or the parole board has required such person to wear.
2. This section does not apply to the owner of the equipment or an agent of the owner
who is performing ordinary maintenance or repairs on the equipment.
3. The offense of tampering with electronic monitoring equipment is a class D felony.
4. The offense of tampering with electronic monitoring equipment if a person
intentionally fails to charge or otherwise disables electronic monitoring equipment is a
class E felony, unless the offense for which the person was placed on electronic
monitoring was a misdemeanor, in which case it is a class A misdemeanor.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.